Massachusetts, session 194th, S1855.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (47/8E) of Section 20 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “board”, the fourth time it
appears, the following words:- in which he receives said remuneration, financial benefit or
consideration of any kind;
of 1